Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 3, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023, as amended by  section 1, chapter 106,
Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 3.  The following amounts are allocated for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from  the
Administrative Services Economic Development Fund, to the Oregon Business Development  De-
partment, for the following purposes:
(1) [Operations ..........................................$ 16,970,908]
Operations................................. $ 17,091,190
(2) Business, innovation
and trade .............................................$ 76,741,709
(3) Infrastructure ..................................... $ 18,828,531
(4) Oregon Film and Video Office ....... $ 1,479,463
SECTION 2.
 Section 25, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 25.  (1) There is allocated to the Oregon Health Authority for the biennium  beginning July
1, 2023, from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of $42,884 for the purpose of grants  under ORS
430.345 for the establishment,  operation and maintenance of alcohol and drug abuse prevention,
early intervention and treatment services provided through a county.
(2) There is allocated to the Law Enforcement Medical Liability  Account established under ORS
414.815, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from the Criminal Fine Account, the  amount of
$1,300,000.
(3) There is allocated to the Oregon State Police for the biennium  beginning July 1, 2023, from
the Criminal  Fine Account, the amount of $351,572 for the purpose of enforcing the laws relating
to driving under the influence of intoxicants.
(4) There  is allocated to the Department of Corrections for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of [ $5,197,236] $0 for the purpose of planning, operating
and maintaining county juvenile and adult corrections programs and facilities  and drug and alcohol
programs. Notwithstanding ORS 137.300 (4), the grant to each county shall be based on  the formula
used to determine the distribution of moneys under the Grant-in-Aid Program under ORS 423.530.
(5) There is allocated to the State Court Technology Fund established under ORS 1.012, for  the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of [ $3,887,500]
$2,927,500.
Enrolled House Bill 5049 (HB 5049-A) Page 1
(6) There is allocated to the Intoxicated Driver  Program Fund created under ORS 813.270, for
the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of $4,323,000.
(7) There is allocated to the Oregon Health Authority  for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of $331,824 for the Emergency Medical Services  and
Trauma Systems Program created under ORS 431A.085.
(8) There is allocated  to the Department of Revenue for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
from the Criminal Fine Account, the amount of $100,000 for administrative costs of  the department.
SECTION 3.  Section 27, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023, as  amended by section 12, chapter 106,
Oregon Laws 2024, is amended to read:
Sec. 27.  (1) There is allocated to the State School Fund established under ORS 327.008,  for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of $40,750,659.
(2) There is  allocated to the Oregon Health Authority, for mental health treatment or for pur-
poses related to alcohol and drug  abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services, for
the biennium beginning  July 1, 2023, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of $20,375,329.
(3) There is allocated to the  Oregon Health Authority, for the health systems division, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount  of $5,093,832 for
purposes related to alcohol and drug abuse prevention, early intervention and treatment services.
(4) There is allocated to the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023,
from the  Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of [ $190,824,043] $189,919,226, for deposit into the
Drug Treatment and Recovery Services Fund.
(5) There  is allocated to the State Police Account established under ORS 181A.020, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, from the Oregon Marijuana Account, the amount of $15,281,497.
SECTION 4.  Section 20, chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023, is amended to read:
Sec. 20. (1) Notwithstanding ORS 137.300, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, the Depart-
ment of Revenue  shall [ distribute the moneys in ] establish a process for distributing available
moneys on a monthly basis from  the Criminal  Fine Account established by ORS 137.300 [ as
specified in ] to fulfill the biennial distributions made by  sections 21 to 25 [ of this 2023 Act ],
chapter 598, Oregon Laws 2023 .
(2) If the moneys from the Criminal Fine Account are insufficient to pay for  the monthly
distributions under subsection (1) of this section, the department shall  reduce the monthly
distributions proportionately in amounts sufficient to accommodate the revenue shortfall.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 5049 (HB 5049-A) Page 2
Passed by House March 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate April 7, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5049 (HB 5049-A) Page 3